Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska29-2249
Office of Probation Administration; created; personnel.

The Office of Probation Administration is hereby created within the judicial branch of government and directly responsible to the Supreme Court. The office shall consist of the probation administrator, the Nebraska Probation System, and such other employees as may be necessary to carry out the functions of the Nebraska Probation System.

Laws 1971, LB 680, § 4;

Laws 1978, LB 625, § 7;

Laws 1979, LB 536, § 3;

Laws 1986, LB 529, § 33.